Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1121
Related services, defined.

Related services means transportation services and such developmental, corrective, and other supportive services, including speech pathology and audiology, psychological services, physical and occupational therapy, recreation, and medical and counseling services, as may be required to assist a child with a disability to benefit from special education and includes the early identification and assessment of disabilities in children. Medical services shall be for diagnostic and evaluation purposes only.

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3310;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 803;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 13.